Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,115
Income tax; taxpayer; failure to pay, account or keep records; penalty.

Any person required under the provisions of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 to pay any income tax or estimated tax, or required by the provisions of such act to make a return, other than a return of estimated tax, keep any records, or supply any information, who willfully fails to pay such tax or estimated tax, make such return, keep such records, or supply such information, at the time or times required by law, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 115, p. 1627;

Laws 1969, c. 645, § 12, p. 2562;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 243.

Portion of this section making violations of regulations of Tax Commissioner a misdemeanor was invalid, but invalid portion was severable. Anderson v. Tiemann, 182 Neb. 393, 155 N.W.2d 322 (1967).